dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აგონია/NSNN
ადგილმამული/NP&v
ადლი/NSNN
ავსტრალია/NSNN
ავსტრიელი/NP
აზია/NSNN
აკლდამა/NPNSNN
ალბა/NSNN
ამბავი/NSNN
ამბოხი/NP
ანაბეჭდი/NSNN
ანგელოზი/NPNSNN
აპარატურა/NSNN
აპარტამენტი/NP&v
არლოვი/NSNN
არჩევნი/NP&v
ასეთი/NPNSNN
აფრა/NSNN
აქლემი/NPNSNN
აღმდგენელი/NP
აღმდგენი/NSNN
ახალგაზრდობა/NSNN
ახალზელანდიელი/NP
ბაზრი/NPNS&v
ბალასტი/NS&v
ბაპტისტი/NP
ბატონი/NPNSNN
ბედნიერი/NPNSNN
ბენეფიციუმი/NSNN
ბინე/NSNN
ბიოფლავონოიდი/NP&v
ბორბლი/NPNS&v
ბორი/NSNN
ბრუნვა/NSNN
ბრძანა/NP
ბუნებისმეტყველი/NP
გა/NP
გაბუდაყება/NSNN
გაგა/NP
გადატრიალი/NP&v
გადაწერა/NSNN
გაერთიანი/NP&v
გაიგივი/NP&v
გალია/NSNN
გამეფი/NP&v
გამოსახვა/NSNN
გამოსხივი/NP&v
გამყიდველი/NP
გამწესება/NSNN
განზომილი/NP&v
განსაზღვრა/NPNSNN
განსხვავება/NP
განწყობილება/NPNSNN
გარდაქცევა/NSNN
გარემო/NPNSNN
გასხვისი/NP&v
გატეხა/NSNN
გაღვივი/NP&v
გაცნობიერება/NSNN
გაწევრიანი/NP&v
გენუა/NSNN
გვარი/NPNSNN
გლახა/NSNN
გლეხი/NPNSNN
გორილა/NP
გრანიტი/NSNN
გულუბრყვილობა/NSNN
და/NPNSNN
დადაბლი/NP&v
დადგენილება/NPNSNN
დაკვირვება/NP
დაკლება/NSNN
დამნაშავეა/NP
დამწერლობა/NPNSNN
დანაკლისი/NSNN
დაპირი/NP
დარღვევა/NPNSNN
დასარტყამი/NP
დაფინანსი/NP&v
დაქვემდებარება/NSNN
დაწესება/NSNN
დაწესებულება/NP
დებული/NP
დეზინფექციი/NS&v
დერეფნი/NPNS&v
დეტერმინიზმი/NSNN
დილა/NSNN
დინოზავრი/NP
დოზა/NPNSNN
დოსიე/NP
დუშეთი/NSNN
დღიური/NPNSNN
ეთნოსი/NSNN
ელინა/NP
ენგელი/NS&v
ერთეულა/NPNSNN
ერთიანობა/NSNN
ექსპერიმენტი/NPNSNN
ვაჟა/NSNN
ვარდი/NPNSNN
ვენი/NP
ვენტილაციი/NS&v
ვისი/NSNN
ვნება/NP
ზეთისხილი/NSNN
ზმნა/NPNSNN
ზონა/NPNSNN
თავა/NPNSNN
თავისთავადობა/NSNN
თავლა/NPNSNN
თანამგზავრი/NPNSNN
თანამდებობა/NPNSNN
თანხმოვნი/NPNS&v
თბილისი/NSNN
თემა/NPNSNN
თვალა/NPNSNN
თვითმოქმედი/NP
თიხა/NSNN
თოჯინა/NPNSNN
თხუნელა/NP
ია/NPNSNN
იდეოლოგია/NPNSNN
იდიოტი/NP
ინგლისი/NSNN
ინდიელი/NPNSNN
ინტელექტი/NSNN
ინტერესი/NPNSNN
ირმი/NS&v
იუდეველი/NP&v
კადრუსი/NSNN
კათოლიკეა/NP
კამარა/NSNN
კანონიერი/NP
კარგი/NSNN
კარი/NPNSNN
კაცი/NPNSNN
კაცხი/NSNN
კვანძი/NPNSNN
კვიპაროსი/NP
კილომეტრი/NSNN
კიტრი/NPNSNN
კოკი/NPNSNN
კოლეგია/NSNN
კომპლექსი/NPNSNN
კომუნიკაცია/NSNN
კონტური/NSNN
კონუსი/NPNSNN
კოსტიუმი/NPNSNN
კოუნინი/NS&v
კრისტალჰიდრატი/NP&v
კუთხე/NPNSNN
კუპე/NP
ლანდშაფტი/NPNSNN
ლაშქრობა/NPNSNN
ლექსიკა/NSNN
ლი/NPNSNNOGOnAnankn
ლოდა/NPNSNN
ლოი/NP&v
მაგი/NSNN
მადნი/NPNS&v
მალაბარი/NS&v
მამული/NPNSNN
მანქანა/NPNSNN
მართლმორწმუნე/NP
მარტვილობა/NSNN
მასივი/NP
მატყლი/NSNN
მაღლობი/NP
მდელო/NPNSNN
მებატონე/NP
მეთოდე/NSNN
მემამულე/NP
მერქნი/NS&v
მესაკუთრე/NP
მეფეა/NP
მეფისწული/NSNN
მთა/NPNSNN
მთავრობა/NPNSNN
მითოლოგიი/NP&v
მითოსი/NSNN
მიმართულება/NP
მინიმუმი/NSNN
მინისტრი/NPNSNN
მისწრაფება/NPNSNN
მიჩინიო/NSNN
მკვლევარი/NPNSNN
მმართველი/NPNSNN
მოგონება/NP
მოვლენა/NPNSNN
მოთხოვნა/NPNSNN
მომვლელი/NP
მონადირე/NPNSNN
მონანიება/NSNN
მორგი/NP&v
მოსამართლე/NPNSNN
მოსაუბრეა/NP
მოქალაქეა/NP
მოღვაწე/NPNSNN
მოძრაობა/NPNSNN
მოწმობა/NSNN
მოხელეა/NP
მსახური/NPNSNN
მსვლელობა/NPNSNN
მუზა/NPNSNN
მუხტი/NPNSNN
მუჰამედი/NSNN
მცდელობა/NPNSNN
მცველი/NSNN
მწყემსი/NPNSNN
მხები/NSNN
ნაგებობა/NPNSNN
ნაზარეთი/NSNN
ნაკაშია/NP
ნანგრევი/NPNSNN
ნატირლი/NP&v
ნაჩალნიკი/NSNN
ნაწერი/NPNSNN
ნებისყოფა/NSNN
ნერვი/NP
ნიმუში/NPNSNN
ნიღბი/NP&v
ნოტი/NPNSNN
ნუკლეინმჟავა/NP
ომი/NPNSNN
ოპერაცია/NPNSNN
ორკესტრი/NPNSNN
ორნამენტი/NPNSNN
ოხუნჯობა/NSNN
პადელნიკი/NP
პარაფინი/NSNN
პარტია/NPNSNN
პატრიარქი/NPNSNN
პენდიი/NP&v
პირველი/NSNN
პირველწყაროა/NP
პოემი/NP
პოზიცია/NPNSNN
პრაქტიკოსი/NP
პრეფექტი/NSNN
პროვაიდერი/NP&v
პროფილაქტიკა/NSNN
პუბლიკაცია/NPNSNN
ჟრუანტელი/NSNN
რადიოტალღი/NP&v
რაციონი/NSNN
რეალია/NP
რეკვა/NSNN
რეკომენდაციი/NP&v
რვა/NSNN
რითმი/NPNSNN
რომანა/NPNSNN
რუკა/NPNSNN
რწმუნება/NSNN
საბადოა/NP
სადგომი/NPNSNN
სადილი/NPNSNN
საზომი/NPNSNN
სათბური/NSNN
საკითხი/NPNSNN
სამადლო/NSNN
სამართალწარმოი/NP&v
სამრეკლოა/NP
სამურზაყანო/NSNN
სანახაობა/NPNSNN
სანსარი/NS&v
სარკმელი/NPNSNN
სასიამოვნო/NSNN
სასოწარკვეთილი/NP
საფეთქლი/NPNS&v
საქაღალდე/NP
საშიშროი/NP&v
საშუალო/NSNN
საჭმელი/NPNSNN
სახელმწიფოებრიობი/NS&v
სახელური/NPNSNN
სენაკი/NPNSNN
სენატორი/NSNN
სიარული/NSNN
სიახლე/NPNSNN
სილა/NSNN
სილფი/NP&v
სიმღერა/NPNSNN
სირაქლემა/NSNN
სისულელე/NPNSNN
სიღარიბე/NSNN
სიწმიდეა/NP
სიხშირე/NPNSNN
სოფიზმი/NP
სპერმატოზოიდი/NSNN
სტანდარტი/NPNSNN
სულა/NPNSNN
სულგრძელები/NS&v
სცენარი/NPNSNN
სწავლა/NPNSNN
ტანკი/NSNN
ტბორი/NP
ტერიტორია/NPNSNN
ტესტი/NPNSNN
ტკივილი/NPNSNN
ტომა/NPNSNN
ტრიბუნა/NSNN
ტურნირი/NP
ტყი/NSNN
უბედურება/NP
უკანალი/NSNN
უმდაბლესი/NP
უმცირესობა/NPNSNN
ურმი/NPNS&v
უსამართლო/NSNN
უფსკრული/NPNSNN
უძრავი/NSNN
ფანტაზია/NPNSNN
ფარდობითობა/NSNN
ფაქტორი/NPNSNN
ფერმენტი/NPNSNN
ფესურა/NP
ფირმა/NPNSNN
ფისი/NSNN
ფორმა/NPNSNN
ფორტეპიანო/NSNN
ფრჩხილი/NP
ფუსფუსი/NSNN
ქარავნი/NP&v
ქარტია/NSNN
ქვეშრე/NPNSNN
ქისტი/NP
ქორწილი/NPNSNN
ქსელი/NPNSNN
ღალატი/NSNN
ღირებულება/NP
ღირსი/NPNSNN
ყანწი/NSNN
ყლუპი/NSNN
ყმა/NPNSNN
შალი/NSNN
შეთქმული/NP
შეკვრა/NSNN
შემწეობა/NSNN
შესახედაობა/NSNN
შესვენება/NP
შეშა/NPNSNN
შეჯამი/NP&v
შვილიშვილი/NSNN
შოუ/NSNN
შურისძიი/NP&v
შუქურა/NSNN
ჩასახვა/NSNN
ჩვენი/NPNSNN
ჩიხა/NPNSNN
ცენზურა/NSNN
ცია/NP
ციტოპლაზმა/NSNN
ცხვრი/NPNS&v
ცხი/NP
ძილი/NSNN
ძროხა/NPNSNN
წამოსასხამი/NSNN
წაღება/NSNN
წერტილი/NPNSNN
წვრილი/NSNN
წისქვილი/NSNN
წმინდანი/NPNSNN
წყარო/NPNSNN
ჭვრეტა/NSNN
ჭიქა/NPNSNN
ხაზინა/NSNN
ხაფანგი/NSNN
ხბოა/NP
ხელყოფი/NS&v
ხიზნი/NP&v
ხილვა/NPNSNN
ხრიკი/NSNN
ჯანმრთელობა/NSNN
ჯეჯილი/NP
ჯოგები/NSNN
ჰორიზონტი/NPNSNN
